New York, session 2025-2026, A10404.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Voices of 2 Immigrant Communities Empowering Survivors (VOICES) Act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 642-b to 4 read as follows: 5 § 642-b. Immigrant victim; certification. 1. For the purposes of this 6 section, the term: 7 (a) "Certification form" means a law enforcement certification or 8 declaration as established by federal immigration law certifying that a 9 person is a victim of qualifying criminal activity or human trafficking 10 including, but not limited to, the information required by Section 11 1184(p) of Title 8 of the United States Code, including current United 12 States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-918, Supplement B, or 13 any successor form for purposes of obtaining U nonimmigrant status or by 14 Section 1184(o) of Title 8 of the United States Code, including current 15 United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-914, Supple- 16 ment B, or any successor form for purposes of obtaining T nonimmigrant 17 status. 18 (b) "Certifying entity" means: 19 (i) A state or local law enforcement agency; 20 (ii) A prosecutor's or district attorney's office; 21 (iii) The office of court administration, where the certifying offi- 22 cial is a judge; 23 (iv) The police department of a state university of New York or a city 24 university of New York; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14588-04-6 A. 10404 2 1 (v) Any other entity or authority that has responsibility for the 2 detection or, investigation or prosecution of a qualifying crime or 3 criminal activity; and 4 (vi) Entities that have criminal detection or investigative jurisdic- 5 tion in their respective areas of expertise, including, but not limited 6 to, child protective services, the division of human rights, and the 7 department of labor. 8 (c) "Certifying official" means: 9 (i) The head of a certifying entity; 10 (ii) A person in a supervisory role who has been designated by the 11 head of a certifying entity to issue certifications under this section 12 on behalf of such entity; 13 (iii) A judge; or 14 (iv) Any other certifying official defined under Section 214.14 (a)(3) 15 of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 16 (d) "Human Trafficking" has the same meaning as "severe forms of traf- 17 ficking in persons" pursuant to Section 7102 of Title 22 of the United 18 States Code and shall include, but not be limited to: 19 (i) Sex trafficking in which a commercial sex act is induced by force, 20 fraud, or coercion, or in which a person induced to perform such act has 21 not attained eighteen years of age; 22 (ii) The recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision, or obtain- 23 ing of a person for labor or services, through the use of force, fraud, 24 or coercion for the purpose of subjection to involuntary servitude, 25 peonage, debt bondage, or slavery; and 26 (iii) Criminal offenses for which the nature and elements of the 27 offenses are substantially similar to the criminal activity described in 28 subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this paragraph, and the attempt, conspiracy, 29 or solicitation to commit any such offenses. 30 (e) "Petitioner" means a person requesting certification under this 31 section such as a victim or a victim's representative, including but not 32 limited to the victim's licensed attorney or representative fully 33 accredited by the United States department of justice, a family member, 34 or crime victim advocate. 35 (f) "Representative fully accredited by the United States department 36 of justice" is a person who is approved by the United States department 37 of justice to represent individuals before the board of immigration 38 appeals, the immigration courts, or the department of homeland security. 39 The representative shall be a person who works for a specific nonprofit, 40 religious, charitable, social service, or similar organization that has 41 been recognized by the United States department of justice to represent 42 those individuals and whose accreditation is in good standing. 43 (g) (i) "Qualifying criminal activity" has the meaning given to that 44 term in 8 C.F.R. 214.14 and shall include, but is not limited to, the 45 following crimes: rape; torture; trafficking; incest; domestic 46 violence; sexual assault; abusive sexual contact; prostitution; sexual 47 exploitation; female genital mutilation; being held hostage; peonage; 48 involuntary servitude; slave trade; kidnapping; abduction; unlawful 49 criminal restraint; false imprisonment; blackmail; extortion; 50 manslaughter; murder; felonious assault; witness tampering; obstruction 51 of justice; perjury; any similar activity; or attempt, conspiracy, or 52 solicitation to commit any such crimes. 53 (ii) The term "any similar activity" refers to criminal offenses in 54 which the nature and elements of the offenses are substantially similar 55 to the statutorily enumerated list of criminal activities. A. 10404 3 1 2. (a) Upon the request of a victim or a petitioner, a certifying 2 official shall, in writing, certify that a victim has been helpful on a 3 certification form designated by the United States Citizenship and Immi- 4 gration Services if: 5 (i) the victim is a victim of qualifying criminal activity or human 6 trafficking; and 7 (ii) the victim has been helpful, is being helpful or is likely to be 8 helpful to the detection or investigation or prosecution of the qualify- 9 ing criminal activity or human trafficking. For purposes of determining 10 victim helpfulness, there is a rebuttable presumption that a victim is 11 helpful, has been helpful or is likely to be helpful to the detection, 12 investigation or prosecution of a qualifying criminal activity or human 13 trafficking if the victim has not refused to provide information and 14 assistance reasonably requested by law enforcement officials. A current 15 or ongoing investigation, a prosecution or a conviction is not required 16 for a certification under this section. 17 (b) A certifying official processing a certification under this 18 section shall: 19 (i) fully complete and sign the certification form; 20 (ii) include in the form specific details about the nature of the 21 qualifying criminal activity detected or investigated or prosecuted and 22 a detailed description of the victim's helpfulness or likely helpful- 23 ness; and 24 (iii) complete the certification form and provide it to the petitioner 25 within thirty days of receiving the request, except: 26 (A) if the petitioner making the request for completion of the certif- 27 ication form is in federal immigration removal proceedings or detained, 28 the certifying official shall complete and provide the certification 29 form to the petitioner no later than seven days after the request is 30 received by the certifying official or entity; and 31 (B) if the children, parents, or siblings of the victim would become 32 ineligible for benefits under Sections 1184(p) and 1184(o) of Title 8 of 33 the United States Code by virtue of age, the certifying official shall 34 complete and provide the certification form to the petitioner no later 35 than seven days after the request is received by the certifying official 36 or entity. 37 3. (a) If a certifying official or entity denies certification under 38 this section, the official or entity shall, in writing, notify the peti- 39 tioner of the reason for the denial. The denial notification shall 40 include, but not be limited to: 41 (i) The date of the denial; and 42 (ii) The reason for the denial consisting of at least one of the 43 following: 44 (A) Lack of qualifying criminal activity or human trafficking; 45 (B) Refusal to provide information or assistance reasonably requested 46 by the certifying entity; 47 (C) Lack of jurisdiction over the certification request; or 48 (D) Other circumstances for which a certifying official or entity may 49 lawfully deny certification. 50 (b) After receiving a denial letter, the petitioner may submit addi- 51 tional evidence to the certifying official or entity. If the petitioner 52 submits additional evidence, the certifying official or entity shall 53 reconsider the denial not more than seven days after the date the certi- 54 fying official or entity receives such additional evidence. 55 (c) A petitioner may submit a new request for certification, after a 56 previous request is denied, from the same or a different certifying A. 10404 4 1 entity for processing, so long as the certifying entity was involved in 2 the detection or investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal 3 activity or human trafficking. 4 (d) A certifying official is immune from civil and criminal liability 5 for, in good faith, certifying or denying certification. 6 4. (a) Certifying entities and certifying officials are prohibited 7 from disclosing the immigration status of a victim or other petitioner 8 unless such disclosure is: 9 (i) required by federal law or legal process; or 10 (ii) authorized by the victim or other petitioner. 11 (b) Documents submitted with a request for certification under this 12 section and any written response to a certification request from a 13 certifying official or entity are confidential and shall not be 14 disclosed unless the disclosure is: 15 (i) required by state or federal law or legal process; 16 (ii) constitutionally required; or 17 (iii) authorized by the victim. 18 (c) A petitioner submitting United States Citizenship and Immigration 19 Services Form I-918, Supplement B or United States Citizenship and Immi- 20 gration Services Form I-914, Supplement B does not have to be present in 21 the United States at the time of filing. The certifying official or 22 entity shall forward the completed certification form to the petitioner 23 without requiring the petitioner to provide government-issued identifi- 24 cation. 25 (d) A certifying entity's inability to communicate with a victim due 26 to the victim's language shall not be considered a refusal or failure to 27 provide assistance. 28 5. (a) Each year, each certifying entity shall file a report to the 29 attorney general regarding certification requests received by the entity 30 during the previous calendar year. Such report shall include, but not be 31 limited to: 32 (i) The total number of certification requests received, requests 33 granted and requests denied, and the number of pending certifications 34 for such year; and 35 (ii) For denied certification requests, the number of times each of 36 the following were the reason for the denial: 37 (A) Lack of qualifying criminal activity or human trafficking; 38 (B) Refusal to provide information or assistance reasonably requested 39 by the certifying entity; 40 (C) Lack of jurisdiction over certification request; or 41 (D) Other circumstances for which a certifying official or entity may 42 lawfully deny certification. 43 (b) A certifying entity that did not receive any certification 44 requests during the previous calendar year shall report that the certi- 45 fying entity received zero requests. 46 (c) A report made under this subdivision shall not contain any 47 personally identifying information. 48 (d) Within ninety days of receiving reports from certifying entities, 49 the attorney general shall prepare a comprehensive report on the certif- 50 ication process and submit the comprehensive report to the speaker of 51 the assembly, the temporary president of the senate, and the governor. 52 The attorney general shall make publicly available the comprehensive 53 report. The comprehensive report shall identify any certifying entity 54 that did not submit a report. A. 10404 5 1 6. (a) A certifying entity or official may certify a Form I-918, 2 Supplement B, or a Form I-914, Supplement B certification for direct 3 victims, indirect victims, and bystander or witness victims. 4 (b) A direct victim is any person who has suffered direct harm or who 5 is directly and proximately harmed as a result of the criminal activity. 6 (c) An indirect victim is a qualifying family member of a direct 7 victim if the direct victim is incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, 8 including spouses, unmarried children under the age of twenty-one, 9 parents if the direct victim was under the age of twenty-one, and 10 siblings under the age of eighteen if the direct victim was under twen- 11 ty-one years of age. Indirect victims shall cooperate in the investi- 12 gation or prosecution but are not required to possess information about 13 the crime itself. Indirect victim cooperation shall include parents who 14 make their children available to communicate with the certifying entity. 15 (d) A bystander or witness victim is any individual who was not the 16 direct target of a crime, but who nevertheless suffered unusually direct 17 injury as a result of the qualifying crime. 18 7. This section shall not reduce the rights or privileges of any immi- 19 grant victim under any other section of law. 20 § 3. Section 483-dd of the social services law is REPEALED. 21 § 4. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 23 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 24 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 25 on or before such effective date.